Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 2. Registration of Voters

§ 2141.
Posting of checklist.

At least 30 days before any local, primary, or general election, the town clerk shall cause copies of the most recent checklist of the persons registered to vote to be posted in two or more public places in the municipality in addition to being posted at the town clerk’s office; however, in a municipality having a population of fewer than 5,000 registered voters, only one checklist in addition to the one posted in the town clerk’s office need be posted.

Upon the checklist shall be stated against the name of each voter, if possible, the street and number of each voter’s residence and otherwise the mailing address of each voter’s residence. Additions or amendments to the checklist may be attached to the checklist by means of a separate list.

The town clerk shall make available a copy of the list, together with lists of corrections and additions when made:

to the chair of each political party in the municipality, upon request, free of charge;

to officers with whom primary petitions are filed under section 2357 of this title, free of charge; and

to any other person, upon request, at cost.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2001, No. 5

, § 3;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2017, No. 50

, § 3.

§ 2142.
Revision of checklist.

The town clerk shall call such meetings of the board of civil authority as may be necessary before an election or at other times for revision of the checklist.

Notice of a meeting, along with a copy of the most recent checklist and a separate list of names that have been challenged and may be removed, shall be posted in two or more public places within each voting district and in the town clerk’s office.

A quorum of the board of civil authority shall be as provided in subdivision 2103(5) of this title, and written notice shall be provided to each member as established in

24 V.S.A. § 801

.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 44

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 2143.
Political representation on board of civil authority.

If the board of civil authority of any political subdivision does not contain at least three members of each major political party and the party committee or at least three voters request increased representation for an underrepresented major political party by filing a written request with the clerk of the political subdivision, the legislative body shall appoint from a list of names submitted to it by the underrepresented party a sufficient number of voters to the board of civil authority to bring the underrepresented major party’s membership on the board to three. A person’s name shall not be submitted unless he or she consents to serve if appointed.

The persons so appointed shall have the same duties and authority with respect to elections as have other members of the board, but those persons shall have no authority with respect to functions of the board of civil authority that are not related to elections.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2001, No. 5

, § 13;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2144.
Submitting applications.

On any day other than the day of an election, the town clerk shall accept a person’s application for his or her name to be placed on the checklist at the town clerk’s office during all normal business hours.

On the day of an election:

A person may submit an application for addition to the checklist to the presiding officer at the polling place of the town in which the person seeks to register during the hours of voting established by the board of civil authority for that polling place. In towns with more than one polling place, the polling place shall be that which covers the area in which the person resides.

The presiding officer or his or her designated election official shall review all applications submitted at the polling place and shall approve those applications that meet the requirements of section 2121 of this chapter. Upon approval, the applicant’s name shall be added to the checklist at the polling place, and the applicant shall be provided with the opportunity to vote in the election. The town clerk shall add the information in the application to the statewide voter checklist within five business days of the day of the election.

If the presiding officer or the designated election official cannot determine from an application submitted on election day that an applicant meets the requirements of section 2121 of this chapter, the presiding officer shall immediately refer the application to any members of the board of civil authority, or its equivalent entity under any applicable charter, present at the polling place, who shall meet immediately and proceed under section 2146 of this chapter to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements of section 2121 of this chapter. For purposes of adding applicant’s names to the checklist under this subdivision (3), a quorum of the board or its equivalent entity shall be as provided in section 2451 of this title. If the board rejects an applicant, it shall notify him or her at the polling place.

, (d)[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1985, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1991, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 26, 1992;

1995, No. 4

, § 1;

1997, No. 47

, § 2;

2001, No. 6

, § 12(a), eff. April 10, 2001;

2003, No. 59

, § 2;

2007, No. 72

, § 1;

2015, No. 44

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 2144a.
Registration.

A person who desires to register to vote may apply in any of the following ways:

Simultaneously with his or her application for, or renewal of, a motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card as provided in section 2145a of this chapter.

By completing a voter registration application at a voter registration agency.

By delivering, during regular hours, or mailing a completed application form to the office of the clerk of the town in which the applicant claims to be a resident.

By completing a voter registration application and delivering it to the presiding officer before the close of the polls at the polling place of the town in which the person seeks to register. In towns with more than one polling place, the polling place shall be that which covers the area in which the person resides.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 47

, § 3; amended

2015, No. 44

, § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2015, No. 80

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 2144b.
Additions to checklist by town clerk.

A town clerk shall review all applications to the voter checklist and shall approve those applications that meet the requirements of this chapter. Once approved, application information shall be added to the statewide voter checklist within three business days of receipt by the town clerk’s office.
(a) (1) A town clerk shall review all applications to the voter checklist and shall approve those applications that meet the requirements of this chapter. Once approved, application information shall be added to the statewide voter checklist within three business days of receipt by the town clerk’s office.

If an applicant has failed upon the date of the election to provide any information required upon the application form pursuant to section 2145 of this title, the town clerk shall notify the applicant that the form was incomplete and the applicant may provide the information on or before the date of the election.

[Repealed.]

If the town clerk does not determine that an applicant meets the requirements of section 2121 of this title, the clerk shall immediately forward the application to the board of civil authority, which shall meet in a timely manner after the receipt of the application and proceed under section 2146 of this title to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements of section 2121. For purposes of adding applicants to the checklist, a quorum shall consist of three members of the board of civil authority.

Periodically, or at least five days prior to each election, the town clerk shall forward to the board of civil authority a list of additions to the checklist.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 7

, § 3, eff. April 10, 2001; amended

2003, No. 59

, § 3;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2145.
Application forms.

The voter registration application shall be in the form approved by the Federal Election Commission or by the Secretary of State. The application form approved by the Secretary shall include:

A place for the applicant to swear or affirm, by checking the appropriate box, that he or she meets all voter eligibility requirements set forth in section 2121 of this title and a place for the signature of the applicant affirming, under penalty of perjury, that all information submitted by the applicant is accurate and truthful. The affirmation shall include the following information:

The applicant’s place and date of birth.

The applicant’s town of legal residence.

The applicant’s street address or a description of the physical location of the applicant’s residence. The description must contain sufficient information so that the town clerk can determine whether the applicant is a resident of the town.

If the applicant has been issued a current and valid driver’s license or nondriver’s identification, the applicant’s driver’s license number or nondriver’s identification number;
(D) (i) If the applicant has been issued a current and valid driver’s license or nondriver’s identification, the applicant’s driver’s license number or nondriver’s identification number;

If the applicant does not possess a driver’s license number, the last four digits of the applicant’s Social Security number; or

If the applicant does not possess a Social Security number, the town clerk shall contact the Secretary of State and the Secretary shall assign a unique identifier for the applicant.

The applicant’s e-mail address, which shall be optional to provide.

The voter’s oath.

Space for the town clerk to document action on the application.

The following statements:

“If you were provided with this application form by a voter registration agency, you may decline to register. If you decline to register, your failure to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.”

“If you are submitting this application through a voter registration agency, the office through which you submitted this application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.”

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

A board of civil authority or town clerk may not require a person to complete any form other than that approved under subsection (a) of this section or section 2145a of this title; nor may the board of civil authority or the town clerk require all applicants or any particular class or group of applicants to appear personally before a meeting of the board or routinely or as a matter of policy require applicants to submit additional information to verify or otherwise support the information contained in the application form.

When the board of civil authority acts on an application to add a name to the checklist, it or, upon request of the board, the town clerk shall notify the applicant by returning one copy of the completed application to the applicant and shall notify the town in which the applicant was last registered to vote, whether within or without the State of Vermont, by submitting the notification electronically within the statewide voter checklist system or by mailing a copy of the completed application to that town before adding the applicant’s name and mailing address to the checklist. The original application shall be filed in the office of the town clerk.

The Secretary of State shall provide each town clerk and voter registration agency with a sufficient number of forms at State expense.

A person who makes a false statement in completing a voter registration application form or the voter registration portion of an application for a motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card or of an application for the services of a designated automatic voter registration agency knowing the statement to be false shall be subject to the penalties of perjury as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 2901

, except that a person who is not eligible to register to vote and who otherwise completes the application accurately shall not be considered to have made a false statement under this subsection by his or her unintentional failure to decline to register on a motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card application under section 2145a of this chapter or on a designated automatic voter registration agency’s application under subsection 2145b(e) of this chapter.

A voter who moves from one address in a town in which that voter is registered to another address in the same town, or whose name has been changed, shall not be required to reapply as provided in this section, but shall notify the town clerk of his or her new name or address, unless such information has been provided to the Department of Motor Vehicles or a voter registration agency, so that the voter’s name may be changed or transferred, if necessary, to the proper subdivision of the checklist. The voter registration application form may be used to notify the clerk or the board that the voter has changed his or her name or address.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1997, No. 47

, § 4;

2001, No. 7

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2002;

2003, No. 59

, § 4;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 44

, § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2015, No. 80

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2017;

2019, No. 67

, § 5a.

§ 2145a.
Registrations at the Department of Motor Vehicles.

An application for, or renewal of, a motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card shall serve as a simultaneous application to register to vote unless the applicant checks the box on the application designating that he or she declines to use the application as a voter registration application.

A motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card application shall provide and request the following information and shall be in the form approved by the Secretary of State:
(b) (1) A motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card application shall provide and request the following information and shall be in the form approved by the Secretary of State:

The applicant’s citizenship.

The applicant’s place and date of birth.

The applicant’s town of legal residence.

The applicant’s street address or a description of the physical location of the applicant’s residence. The description must contain sufficient information so that the town clerk can determine whether the applicant is a resident of the town.

The voter’s oath.

The applicant’s e-mail address, which shall be optional to provide.

A motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card application shall provide the following statements:

“By signing and submitting this application, you are authorizing the Department of Motor Vehicles to transmit this application to the Secretary of State for voter registration purposes. YOU MAY DECLINE TO REGISTER. Both the office through which you submit this application and your decision of whether or not to register will remain confidential and will be used for voter registration purposes only.”

“In order to be registered to vote, you must: (1) be a U.S. citizen; (2) be a resident of Vermont; (3) have taken the voter’s oath; and (4) be 18 years of age or older. Any person meeting the requirements of (1)-(3) who will be 18 years of age on or before the date of a general election may register and vote in the primary election immediately preceding that general election. Failure to decline to register is an attestation that you meet the requirements to vote.”

A motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification card application shall provide the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter registration application and shall require the signature of the applicant, under penalty of perjury.

An application for voter registration under this section shall update any previous voter registration by the applicant. Any change of address form submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles in connection with an application for a motor vehicle driver’s license shall serve to update voter registration information previously provided by the voter, unless the voter states on the form that the change of address is not for voter registration purposes.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall transmit motor vehicle driver’s license and nondriver identification card applications received under this section to the Secretary of State not later than five days after the date the application was accepted by the Department, or before the date of any primary or general election, whichever is sooner.
(d) (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall transmit motor vehicle driver’s license and nondriver identification card applications received under this section to the Secretary of State not later than five days after the date the application was accepted by the Department, or before the date of any primary or general election, whichever is sooner.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not transmit motor vehicle driver’s license and nondriver identification card applications when the applicant has designated that he or she declines to be registered.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall ensure confidentiality of records as required by subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

The Secretary shall promptly transmit applications received under this section to the clerks of the appropriate municipalities.

In transmitting applications received under this section, the Secretary shall ensure compliance with the requirements of 15 V.S.A. chapter 21, subchapter 3.

If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes registered to vote pursuant to this section in the absence of a violation of subsection 2145(f) of this chapter, that person’s registration shall be presumed to have been effected with official authorization and not the fault of that person.

The Secretary shall take appropriate measures to educate the public about voter registration under this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of this section or any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall share its motor vehicle driver’s license, driver privilege card, and nondriver identification card customer data with the Secretary of State’s office for the Secretary’s use in conducting voter registration and voter checklist maintenance activities.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 47

, § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 44

, § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2015, No. 80

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2019, No. 67

, § 6.

§ 2145b.
Voter registration agencies.

Each voter registration agency shall:

distribute voter registration application forms approved under section 2145 of this title;

assist applicants in completing voter registration application forms, unless the applicant refuses such assistance; and

accept completed voter registration applications and transmit completed applications to the Secretary of State not later than 10 days after the date of acceptance, or before the date of any primary or general election, whichever is sooner.

The Secretary shall promptly transmit applications received under this section to the clerks of the appropriate municipalities.

A voter registration agency shall provide each applicant who does not decline to register to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the voter registration application that the office provides with regard to the completion of its own forms, unless the applicant refuses such assistance.
(c) (1) A voter registration agency shall provide each applicant who does not decline to register to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the voter registration application that the office provides with regard to the completion of its own forms, unless the applicant refuses such assistance.

If an agency provides services to a person with a disability at the person’s home, the agency shall provide the services described in subsection (a) of this section at the person’s home.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a voter registration agency that provides services or assistance in addition to conducting voter registration shall distribute a voter registration application with each application for the services or assistance provided by the agency, and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to those services or assistance. In addition to the voter registration application form, the agency shall distribute a separate form that includes the following:

The question, “If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today?”

In the case of an agency that provides public assistance, the statement, “Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency.”

Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant would like to register or declines to register to vote, together with the statement, “IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX, YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.”

The statement, “If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application form in private.”

The statement, “If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote, you may file a complaint with the Secretary of State (Secretary of State’s office address and telephone number).”

The Secretary of State may designate voter registration agencies that shall provide qualified applicants for such agency’s services, or qualified inmates within the custody of the Department of Corrections, with automatic voter registration as an integrated option on application forms for services provided by those agencies.

Such designations shall be limited to a voter registration agency or a specific program administered by such an agency:

that, in the regular course of the agency’s or program’s business, already collects and verifies documents necessary to provide proof of an individual’s eligibility to vote under subchapter 1 of this chapter; and

whose secretary, commissioner, or other applicable head of the agency has approved of such designation.

A voter registration agency shall not collect data necessary to establish an individual’s eligibility to vote solely for the purpose of being designated an automatic voter registration agency under this subsection.

On or before January 1 of each year, the Secretary shall, in accordance with the approval given by a voter registration agency’s secretary, commissioner, or other head:

publish on his or her official website a list of voter registration agencies designated under this subsection;

specify which programs or services offered by each agency are included within the designation; and

provide the date by which the agency’s specified programs or services will comply with requirements of this subsection.

Beginning on the date by which a voter registration agency’s specified programs or services will comply with requirements of this subsection, an application for those services and any change of address form related to those services provided by the agency shall request the following information in a form approved by the Secretary of State:

The applicant’s citizenship.

The applicant’s date of birth.

The applicant’s town of legal residence.

The applicant’s street address or a description of the physical location of the applicant’s residence. The description must contain sufficient information so that the town clerk can determine whether the applicant is a resident of the town.

The voter’s oath.

The applicant’s e-mail address, which shall be optional to provide.

An application for a designated automatic voter registration agency’s services shall provide the following statements:

“By signing and submitting this application, you are authorizing this voter registration agency to transmit this application to the Secretary of State for voter registration purposes. YOU MAY DECLINE TO REGISTER. Both the office through which you submit this application and your decision of whether or not to register will remain confidential and will be used for voter registration purposes only.”

“In order to be registered to vote, you must: (1) be a U.S. citizen; (2) be a resident of Vermont; (3) have taken the voter’s oath; and (4) be 18 years of age or older. Any person meeting the requirements of (1)-(3) who will be 18 years of age on or before the date of a general election may register and vote in the primary election immediately preceding that general election. Failure to decline to register is an attestation that you meet the requirements to vote.”

An application for a designated automatic voter registration agency’s services shall provide the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter registration application and shall require the signature of the applicant, under penalty of perjury.
(6) (A) An application for a designated automatic voter registration agency’s services shall provide the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter registration application and shall require the signature of the applicant, under penalty of perjury.

If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes registered to vote pursuant to this subsection in the absence of a violation of subsection 2145(f) of this chapter, that person’s registration shall be presumed to have been effected with official authorization and not the fault of that person.

The Secretary of State shall have the authority to audit any voter registration agency to determine compliance with the requirements of this section and to require any voter registration agency to implement any remedial measures necessary to ensure compliance with this section.
(f) (1) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to audit any voter registration agency to determine compliance with the requirements of this section and to require any voter registration agency to implement any remedial measures necessary to ensure compliance with this section.

The Secretary of Administration shall provide the Secretary of State any assistance that is necessary to ensure the cooperation of voter registration agencies in implementing any remedial measures the Secretary of State requires under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 47

, § 6; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 44

, § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2019, No. 67

, § 7.

§ 2145c.
Submission of voter registration forms by other persons or organizations.

Any person or any organization other than a voter registration agency that accepts a completed voter registration form on behalf of an applicant shall submit that form to the town clerk of the town of that applicant not later than seven days after the date of acceptance, or before the date of any primary or general election, whichever is sooner.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2015, No. 44

, § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 2146.
Action of board of civil authority or town clerk in revising checklist.

At a meeting to revise the checklist, the board of civil authority shall determine whether any person who has applied to be registered to vote meets the requirements of section 2121 of this title. On demand of a majority of the board present, applicants may be examined under oath concerning the facts stated in the application. The board may make such investigation as it deems proper to verify any statement made under oath by an applicant.

As soon as possible, after receipt of an application, the board or, upon request of the board, the town clerk shall inform an applicant of its action as provided in subsection (d) of section 2145 of this chapter. If the board rejects an applicant, it shall also notify him or her forthwith, in person or by first-class mail directed to the address given in the application, of its reasons. The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

If the notice required under subsection (b) of this section is returned undelivered, the board of civil authority shall proceed to remove the person’s name from the checklist in the manner set forth in section 2150 of this title.

REJECTION OF APPLICATION FOR ADDITION TO CHECKLIST The Board of Civil Authority of , =font8 (Town/City) having met on , 20 to consider applications for addition to the checklist, has found probable cause, as stated below, to reject the application of
. =font8 (Name) Cause for rejection: (a) AGE: (b) CITIZENSHIP: (c) VOTER’S OATH: (d RESIDENCE: The Board of Civil Authority will meet on the day of , 20 , at o’clock at the following location: to reconsider your application and give you an opportunity to appear before the Board. You may present any information or witnesses you wish at that time, or you may appeal directly to any Superior judge in this county or district. =font8 Town Clerk or Chair of Board of Civil Authority

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1997, No. 47

, §§ 7, 11;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 72.

§ 2147.
Alteration of checklist.

Pursuant to section 2150 of this title, the board of civil authority or, upon request of the board, the town clerk shall add to the checklist the names of the voters added and the names omitted by mistake and shall strike the names of persons not entitled to vote. The list so corrected shall not be altered except by:

adding the names of persons as directed by any Superior judge on appeal;

adding the names of persons who are legal voters at the election but whose names are further discovered to be omitted from the completed checklist solely through inadvertence or error;

adding the names of persons who present a valid application for addition to the checklist of that town or a copy thereof, and who otherwise are qualified to be added to the checklist;

[Repealed.]

subdividing the checklist as provided in section 2501 of this title, including the transfer of names of voters who have moved within a town in which they are already registered from one voting district within that town to another; or

adding the names of persons who previously submitted an incomplete application and who provide that information on or before election day.

Any correction or transfer may be accomplished at any time until the closing of the polls on election day. Each voter has primary responsibility to ascertain that his or her name is properly added to and retained on the checklist.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 7

, § 2, eff. April 10, 2001;

2003, No. 59

, § 5;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 44

, § 8, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 2148.
Appeal from board of civil authority.

Any person whose application to vote has been rejected or whose name has been removed from the checklist may appeal to any Superior judge in the county in which the applicant claims residence. If there is no judge available in the county the appeal may be taken to any Superior judge. When an appeal is initiated after the Thursday immediately preceding the day of an election, it shall be conducted at once by the judge. In all instances, the appeal shall be conducted with sufficient speed, in order to resolve, when possible, all issues on appeal in sufficient time to permit a successful appellant to vote at the pending election. Neither formal pleadings nor filing fee shall be required and an appellant may represent himself or herself.

An appeal is commenced by presenting an informal but written notice of appeal to the judge to whom the appeal is taken. The notice need only be sufficient to identify the appellant and the town in which he or she has been denied eligibility to vote. The judge shall forthwith schedule a hearing and notify the appellant and the town clerk, personally or by certified mail. The appellant and any other person may present evidence at the hearing, which shall be conducted informally so as to do substantial justice to all parties.

Upon conclusion of the hearing the judge shall issue a written order, either affirming the decision of the board of civil authority, or ordering that the appellant’s name be added to the checklist. The applicant shall not be permitted to vote unless and until the town clerk receives a written order from the court ordering that the applicant be permitted to vote.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

1985, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 2149.
Conclusiveness of list.

A person shall not vote at an election unless his or her name is on the checklist applicable to the municipality, but the checklist may be amended and corrected for such election as provided in this title. The eligibility of a person to vote shall not be challenged on the day of election if the person’s name is on the checklist, except as provided in section 2564 of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section:

If the voter registration records indicate that a voter has moved from an address in the area covered by the polling place, the voter shall be permitted to vote at that polling place if the voter makes an oral or written affirmation that he or she continues to reside in the area covered by that polling place. The affirmation authorized by this subdivision shall be made at the polling place before an election official.

If a voter who failed to return notice sent pursuant to section 2150 of this title has moved from an address in the area covered by one polling place to an address in an area covered by a different polling place within the same municipality, the voter shall upon oral or written confirmation, be permitted to correct the voting records and vote in the current election at the appropriate polling place. The affirmation authorized by this subdivision shall be made at the appropriate polling place before an election official.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 47

, § 8.